Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.010

Pretrial statement of compensation to be paid in event of settlement.

In all actions for the condemnation of property, or any interest therein, at least thirty days prior to the date set for trial of such action the condemnor shall serve a written statement showing the amount of total just compensation to be paid in the event of settlement on each condemnee who has made an appearance in the action.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 125 s 1.]